Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.170

Discrimination prohibited.

For all of the purposes of this chapter, no person shall, because of race, creed, color, sex, or national origin, be subjected to any discrimination.

[ 2002 c 218 s 19; 1965 c 7 s 35.81.170. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.

Discrimination—Human rights commission: Chapter 49.60 RCW.